Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 360.18, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 360.18. A. Governing boards of institutions of higher


education or private schools, boards of education of public school


districts, and airport public trusts are authorized to establish


campus police departments pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Campus Security Act. In the case of airport public trusts operating


more than one airport, the board of trustees of such airport public


trust is authorized to establish campus police departments at any



Req. No. 2612 Page 1


airport it operates, but is not required to establish campus police


departments at all airports operated by such airport public trust.


These B. The governing boards may employ and commission campus


police officers and may designate uniforms, badges, and insignia to


be worn by such officers and displayed on vehicles or other


equipment of the department. Campus police departments shall use


the following words or phrases, alone or in any combination, in


conjunction with the uniform, badges, insignia, or on vehicles


utilized by these departments: university police, university public


safety department, campus police department, campus police officer,


campus public safety department, campus public safety officer,


airport officer, airport police officer, airport security officer,


airport public safety officer, or any standardized title such as


director, chief, major, captain, lieutenant, sergeant, or corporal.


Upon appointment, each such officer shall be given a written


commission, with a photo identification, evidencing the officer’s


appointment and authority. The form of this commission shall be


prescribed by the governing boards specified in Section 360.15 et


seq. of this title. Persons employed by a governing board which has


established a campus police department but who are not campus police


officers shall not be permitted to wear uniforms, badges, or


insignia specified in this subsection or receive commissions or


photo identification of the type provided campus police officers.



Req. No. 2612 Page 2


C. Campus police officers employed by governing boards of


institutions of higher education and public school district boards


of education shall complete a minimum of six (6) hours of evidence-


based sexual assault and sexual violence training as provided for in


subsection B of Section 3311.5 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


A campus police officer employed as of the effective date of this


act who has not completed the sexual assault and sexual violence


training required by this subsection shall complete such training


within one (1) year.


B. D. The commission of a campus police officer may be


suspended or revoked by the governing board for any reason. Such


commission also may be suspended or revoked by the district attorney


in whose district the officer is employed for cause related to the


campus police officer’s ability to exercise the powers of such


commission in the interest of public security or suspended or


revoked by the district attorney upon conviction of the campus


police officer for larceny, theft, embezzlement, false pretense,


fraud, any nonconsensual sex offense, any offense involving a minor


as a victim, any offense involving the possession, use, distribution


or sale of a controlled dangerous substance, or any offense


involving a firearm. The commission of a campus police officer


convicted of a felony or of a crime involving moral turpitude shall


be revoked by the district attorney upon conviction. The commission


of a campus police officer no longer employed by the governing

Req. No. 2612 Page 3


board, except an officer who is retiring, shall be relinquished to


the board, or its representative, at the time of cessation of the


employment. When a commission is revoked or relinquished, the


campus police department shall take possession of all campus police


officer insignia, badges, identification cards, and weapons issued


to the officer. A person who fails to relinquish the insignia,


badges, identification cards or weapons, upon conviction, shall be


deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by the


imposition of a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed


one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


C. E. Governing boards shall notify the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) when an officer is


commissioned or a commission is relinquished or revoked. The


governing boards shall provide CLEET with all information regarding


commissioned officers requested by CLEET.


D. F. A campus police officer employed pursuant to the Oklahoma


Campus Security Act shall not be able to participate in either the


Oklahoma Police Pension and Retirement System or the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement System, unless otherwise entitled to by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 2612 Page 4


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2612 EB 12/30/2025 8:52:21 AM









































Req. No. 2612 Page 5